Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4429
Bondholders; pledge and agreement of the state.

The State of Nebraska does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds issued pursuant to the Good Life District Economic Development Act and with those persons who may enter into contracts with any city pursuant to the act that the state will not alter, impair, or limit the rights thereby vested until the bonds, together with applicable interest, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed in accordance with the act. Nothing contained in the act shall preclude such alteration, impairment, or limitation if and when adequate provisions are made by law for the protection of the holders of the bonds or persons entering into contracts with a city.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 22.